District of Columbia statutes.
38-1800.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “District of Columbia School Reform Act of 1995”.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 226, Pub. L. 104-134, § 2001

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-821.01 and § 38-1833.02.